California, session 20252026, SB1197.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Changing between standard time and daylight saving time is disruptive to health, safety, and education.(b) The California Medical Association, California Sleep Society, American Academy of Sleep Medicine, National Sleep Foundation, Sleep Research Society, and Society for Research on Biological Rhythms advise against permanent daylight saving time and recommend permanent standard time due to impacts to health.(c) Permanent daylight saving time has historically been repealed due to its harm to health, safety, and education, after its trials during World War II and the 1970s.(d) Federal law permits standard time by exemption from daylight saving time as the only alternative to biannual changing of clocks.(e) Permanent standard time has been historically proven to last without incident for decades.(f) Neighboring states are considering moving to permanent standard time so coordination with those states regarding timekeeping is essential for consistency.(g) Permanent standard time has been historically proven to work without incident.SEC. 2. Section 6808 of the Government Code is amended to read:6808. (a) (1) The standard time within the state is that of the fifth zone designated by federal law as Pacific standard time (15 U.S.C. Secs. 261 and 263).(b)The standard time within the state shall advance by one hour during the daylight saving time period commencing at 2 a.m. on the second Sunday of March of each year and ending at 2 a.m. on the first Sunday of November of each year.(c)Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the Legislature may amend this section by a two-thirds vote to change the dates and times of the daylight saving time period, consistent with federal law, and, if federal law authorizes the state to provide for the year-round application of daylight saving time, the Legislature may amend this section by a two-thirds vote to provide for that application.(2) The state and all political subdivisions of the state shall observe the standard time pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) The state and all political subdivisions of the state, pursuant to the exemption from the advancement of standard time authorized by Section 260a of Title 15 of the United States Code, shall be exempt from the advancement of standard time.(c) If the federal government adopts year-long daylight saving time, then the state, and all political subdivisions of the state, shall set time to conform with that federal adoption, effective upon whichever date as shall be provided by federal law.